District of Columbia statutes.
29-1203.08

Power to sue and be sued.

A statutory trust may sue and be sued in its own name.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720

History

This section is referenced in § 29-1201.04 and § 29-1204.05.

Section References

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 308 of the Uniform Statutory Trust Entity Act.

Editor's Notes